src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-tijems_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - тиемс: # Verb 'to make; do' - full paradigm
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: тиян
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: тият
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: тии
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: тихтяма
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: тихтяда
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: тиихть
# тие тиезь тиемста тиемда тиеманкса
# тихть тийхтяма ти
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: тиень
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: тиеть
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: тись
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: тиеме
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: тиеде
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: тисть
     
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1: тиелень
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2: тиелеть
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3: тиель
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1: тиелеме
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2: тиеледе
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3: тиельхть
     
     тиемс+V+Imprt+ScSg2: тик
     тиемс+V+Imprt+ScPl2: тиеда
     
     тиемс+V+Opt+ScSg1: тиезан
     тиемс+V+Opt+ScSg2: тиезат
     тиемс+V+Opt+ScSg3: тиеза
     тиемс+V+Opt+ScPl1: тиестама
     тиемс+V+Opt+ScPl2: тиестада
     тиемс+V+Opt+ScPl3: тиест

#
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcSg1: тисамак
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg1: тисамань
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcSg1: тисамасть
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg1: тисамазь
#
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcSg2: тийхтя
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg2: тийхтянза
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcSg2: тийхтядязь
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg2: тийхтядязь
#
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcSg3: тиса
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcSg3: тисак
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg3: тисы
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcSg3: тисаськ
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcSg3: тисасть
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg3: тисазь
#
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcPl1: тисамасть
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl1: тисамазь
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcPl1: тисамасть
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl1: тисамазь
#
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcPl2: тийхтядязь
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl2: тийхтядязь
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcPl2: тийхтядязь
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl2: тийхтядязь
#
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcPl3: тисайне
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcPl3: тисайть
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl3: тисыне
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcPl3: тисаськ
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcPl3: тисасть
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl3: тисазь
#
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg1: тиемайть
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg1: тиемань
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg1: тиемасть
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg1: тиемазь
#
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg2: тиихтень
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg2: тиензе
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg2: тиедязь
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg2: тиедязь
#
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg3: тиине
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg3: тиить
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg3: тиезе
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg3: тиеськ
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg3: тиесть
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg3: тиезь
#
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl1: тиемасть
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl1: тиемазь
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl1: тиемасть
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl1: тиемазь
#
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl2: тиедязь
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl2: тиедязь
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl2: тиедязь
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl2: тиедязь
#
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl3: тиине
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl3: тиить
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl3: тиезень
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl3: тиеськ
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl3: тиесть
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl3: тиезь
#
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+OcSg1: тиелемайть
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg1: тиелемань
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcSg1: тиелемасть
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg1: тиелемазь
#
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+OcSg2: тиелихтень
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg2: тиелензе
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcSg2: тиеледязь
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg2: тиеледязь
#
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+OcSg3: тиелине
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+OcSg3: тиелить
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg3: тиелезе
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcSg3: тиелеськ
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcSg3: тиелесть
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg3: тиелезь
#
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+OcPl1: тиелемасть
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl1: тиелемазь
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcPl1: тиелемасть
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl1: тиелемазь
#
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+OcPl2: тиеледязь
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl2: тиеледязь
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcPl2: тиеледязь
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl2: тиеледязь
#
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+OcPl3: тиелине
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+OcPl3: тиелить
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl3: тиелезень
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcPl3: тиелеськ
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcPl3: тиелесть
     тиемс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl3: тиелезь
#
     тиемс+V+Imprt+ScSg2: тик
     тиемс+V+Imprt+ScPl2: тиеда
#
     тиемс+V+Imprt+ScSg2+OcSg1: тиемак
     тиемс+V+Imprt+ScPl2+OcSg1: тиемасть
     тиемс+V+Imprt+ScSg2+OcSg3: тик
     тиемс+V+Imprt+ScPl2+OcSg3: тиесть
#
     тиемс+V+Cond+ScSg2+OcSg1: тиендярясамак
     тиемс+V+Cond+ScSg3+OcSg1: тиендярясамань
     тиемс+V+Cond+ScPl2+OcSg1: тиендярясамасть
     тиемс+V+Cond+ScPl3+OcSg1: тиендярясамазь
#
     тиемс+V+Cond+ScSg1+OcSg2: тиендярятя
     тиемс+V+Cond+ScSg3+OcSg2: тиендярятанза
     тиемс+V+Cond+ScPl1+OcSg2: тиендярятядязь
     тиемс+V+Cond+ScPl3+OcSg2: тиендярятядязь
#
     тиемс+V+Cond+ScSg1+OcSg3: тиендяряса
     тиемс+V+Cond+ScSg2+OcSg3: тиендярясак
     тиемс+V+Cond+ScSg3+OcSg3: тиендярясы
     тиемс+V+Cond+ScPl1+OcSg3: тиендярясаськ
     тиемс+V+Cond+ScPl2+OcSg3: тиендярясасть
     тиемс+V+Cond+ScPl3+OcSg3: тиендярясазь
#
     тиемс+V+Cond+ScSg2+OcPl1: тиендярясамасть
     тиемс+V+Cond+ScSg3+OcPl1: тиендярясамазь
     тиемс+V+Cond+ScPl2+OcPl1: тиендярясамасть
     тиемс+V+Cond+ScPl3+OcPl1: тиендярясамазь
#
     тиемс+V+Cond+ScSg1+OcPl2: тиендярятядязь
     тиемс+V+Cond+ScSg3+OcPl2: тиендярятядязь
     тиемс+V+Cond+ScPl1+OcPl2: тиендярятядязь
     тиемс+V+Cond+ScPl3+OcPl2: тиендярятядязь
#
     тиемс+V+Cond+ScSg1+OcPl3: тиендярясайне
     тиемс+V+Cond+ScSg2+OcPl3: тиендярясайть
     тиемс+V+Cond+ScSg3+OcPl3: тиендярясыне
     тиемс+V+Cond+ScPl1+OcPl3: тиендярясаськ
     тиемс+V+Cond+ScPl2+OcPl3: тиендярясасть
     тиемс+V+Cond+ScPl3+OcPl3: тиендярясазь
#
     тиемс+V+Conj+ScSg2+OcSg1: тиелемайть
     тиемс+V+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg1: тиелемань
     тиемс+V+Conj+ScPl2+OcSg1: тиелемасть
     тиемс+V+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg1: тиелемазь
#
     тиемс+V+Conj+ScSg1+OcSg2: тиелихтень
     тиемс+V+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg2: тиелензе
     тиемс+V+Conj+ScPl1+OcSg2: тиеледязь
     тиемс+V+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg2: тиеледязь
#
     тиемс+V+Conj+ScSg1+OcSg3: тиелине
     тиемс+V+Conj+ScSg2+OcSg3: тиелить
     тиемс+V+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg3: тиелезе
     тиемс+V+Conj+ScPl1+OcSg3: тиелеськ
     тиемс+V+Conj+ScPl2+OcSg3: тиелесть
     тиемс+V+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg3: тиелезь
#
     тиемс+V+Conj+ScSg2+OcPl1: тиелемасть
     тиемс+V+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl1: тиелемазь
     тиемс+V+Conj+ScPl2+OcPl1: тиелемасть
     тиемс+V+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl1: тиелемазь
#
     тиемс+V+Conj+ScSg1+OcPl2: тиеледязь
     тиемс+V+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl2: тиеледязь
     тиемс+V+Conj+ScPl1+OcPl2: тиеледязь
     тиемс+V+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl2: тиеледязь
#
     тиемс+V+Conj+ScSg1+OcPl3: тиелине
     тиемс+V+Conj+ScSg2+OcPl3: тиелить
     тиемс+V+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl3: тиелезень
     тиемс+V+Conj+ScPl1+OcPl3: тиелеськ
     тиемс+V+Conj+ScPl2+OcPl3: тиелесть
     тиемс+V+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl3: тиелезь
#

     тиемс+V+Cond+Conj+ScSg2+OcSg1: тиендярялемайть
     тиемс+V+Cond+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg1: тиендярялемань
     тиемс+V+Cond+Conj+ScPl2+OcSg1: тиендярялемасть
     тиемс+V+Cond+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg1: тиендярялемазь
#
     тиемс+V+Cond+Conj+ScSg1+OcSg2: тиендярялихтень
     тиемс+V+Cond+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg2: тиендярялензе
     тиемс+V+Cond+Conj+ScPl1+OcSg2: тиендяряледязь
     тиемс+V+Cond+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg2: тиендяряледязь
#
     тиемс+V+Cond+Conj+ScSg1+OcSg3: тиендярялине
     тиемс+V+Cond+Conj+ScSg2+OcSg3: тиендярялить
     тиемс+V+Cond+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg3: тиендярялезе
     тиемс+V+Cond+Conj+ScPl1+OcSg3: тиендярялеськ
     тиемс+V+Cond+Conj+ScPl2+OcSg3: тиендярялесть
     тиемс+V+Cond+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg3: тиендярялезь
#
     тиемс+V+Cond+Conj+ScSg2+OcPl1: тиендярялемасть
     тиемс+V+Cond+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl1: тиендярялемазь
     тиемс+V+Cond+Conj+ScPl2+OcPl1: тиендярялемасть
     тиемс+V+Cond+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl1: тиендярялемазь
#
     тиемс+V+Cond+Conj+ScSg1+OcPl2: тиендяряледязь
     тиемс+V+Cond+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl2: тиендяряледязь
     тиемс+V+Cond+Conj+ScPl1+OcPl2: тиендяряледязь
     тиемс+V+Cond+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl2: тиендяряледязь
#
     тиемс+V+Cond+Conj+ScSg1+OcPl3: тиендярялине
     тиемс+V+Cond+Conj+ScSg2+OcPl3: тиендярялить
     тиемс+V+Cond+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl3: тиендярялезень
     тиемс+V+Cond+Conj+ScPl1+OcPl3: тиендярялеськ
     тиемс+V+Cond+Conj+ScPl2+OcPl3: тиендярялесть
     тиемс+V+Cond+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl3: тиендярялезь
#
     тиемс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg2+OcSg1: тиелексолемайть
     тиемс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg1: тиелексолемань
     тиемс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl2+OcSg1: тиелексолемасть
     тиемс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg1: тиелексолемазь
#
     тиемс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg1+OcSg2: тиелексолихтень
     тиемс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg2: тиелексолензе
     тиемс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl1+OcSg2: тиелексоледязь
     тиемс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg2: тиелексоледязь
#
     тиемс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg1+OcSg3: тиелексолине
     тиемс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg2+OcSg3: тиелексолить
     тиемс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg3: тиелексолезе
     тиемс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl1+OcSg3: тиелексолеськ
     тиемс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl2+OcSg3: тиелексолесть
     тиемс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg3: тиелексолезь
#
     тиемс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg2+OcPl1: тиелексолемасть
     тиемс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl1: тиелексолемазь
     тиемс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl2+OcPl1: тиелексолемасть
     тиемс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl1: тиелексолемазь
#
     тиемс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg1+OcPl2: тиелексоледязь
     тиемс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl2: тиелексоледязь
     тиемс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl1+OcPl2: тиелексоледязь
     тиемс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl2: тиелексоледязь
#
     тиемс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg1+OcPl3: тиелексолине
     тиемс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg2+OcPl3: тиелексолить
     тиемс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl3: тиелексолезень
     тиемс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl1+OcPl3: тиелексолеськ
     тиемс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl2+OcPl3: тиелексолесть
     тиемс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl3: тиелексолезь
#
